Idaho, session 2025, H0075.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1017, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 10, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1017, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1017. PUBLIC EDUCATION FACILITIES FUND. (1) There is hereby cre-
ated a fund in the state treasury to be known as the public education facili-
ties fund to which shall be credited all moneys that may be appropriated, ap-
portioned, allocated, and paid back to such fund. Moneys in the fund shall
be distributed as need-based grants to school districts for the purposes of
financing the construction, remodel, and maintenance of school facilities
directly related to the school district's core educational mission. No such
funds shall be used for facilities with a primary athletic purpose. Grants
from such fund shall be distributed to school districts as provided in this
section. The fund shall be managed by the office of the state board of edu-
cation. For the purposes of this section, "school district" means any public
school district established pursuant to the laws of this state, including
specially chartered school districts, and shall not include public charter
schools established pursuant to chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code.
(2)(a) A school district that is in compliance with all of the require-
ments of sections 33-917 and 33-918, Idaho Code, and that demonstrates
financial need may apply to the office of the state board of education


to receive grant funds from the public education facilities fund to fi-
nance the construction, remodel, or maintenance of public school facil-
ities pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. An application for
such grant shall be submitted to the office of the state board of educa-
tion and shall include but not be limited to the following information:
(i) A detailed plan that outlines the location, design, plans,
and specifications of the proposed school facility construction,
remodel, or maintenance project that is the basis of the grant
application and includes copies of all bids received related to
the proposed school project, the projected cost of such proposed
school project as verified by all bids received related to the pro-
posed school project, and any costs to finance the project if the
funding was to be secured through a bond levy pursuant to chapter
8, title 33, Idaho Code;
(ii) A copy of the school district's ten (10) year plan created
pursuant to section 33-918, Idaho Code;
(iii) Details concerning any unsafe or unhealthy conditions as de-
scribed in section 33-1613, Idaho Code, that would be abated with
the proceeds of the grant;
(iv) Whether the applicant school district has failed to approve a
bond levy for the proposed school facility project;
(v) The financial condition of the applicant school district as
shown by copies of its budgets for the preceding three (3) years;
(vi) A comprehensive list of all funds that the applicant school
district has received from any source in the previous year and any
funds that it anticipates to receive from any source in the next
year; and
(vii) Any other relevant details regarding the financial need of
the applicant school district.
(b) The office of the state board of education shall review all appli-
cations for grant funds pursuant to this section to determine whether
to approve any such application and, upon approval, shall award grants
in accordance with the provisions of this section. Grant decisions
shall be made and awarded to the school districts with the greatest need
as represented in the materials submitted with the applications, pro-
vided that preference shall be given to rural schools as that term is
described in section 33-319, Idaho Code. In reviewing grant applica-
tions, the office of the state board of education shall consult with the
state department of education and the division of public works within
the department of administration to assist in determining whether to
award a grant under this section.
(c) The office of the state board of education shall prescribe forms for
applying for the grant pursuant to this section.
(d) The office of the state board of education shall submit payment re-
quests for grants awarded pursuant to this section to the state depart-
ment of education, and the state department of education shall pay to
school districts any grants awarded from the public education facili-
ties fund.
(e) The applicant school district shall use any funds received pursuant
to a public education facilities fund grant in accordance with the plan


submitted pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection. If funds are
used in conflict with such plan, the school district shall pay back the
grant funds with interest.
(3) Idle moneys in the public education facilities fund shall be in-
vested by the treasurer in the same manner as provided pursuant to section
67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest earned on moneys in the fund shall be returned
to the public education facilities fund.
SECTION 3. That Section 33-909, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 10, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-909A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-909A. TRANSFER OF FUNDS FROM THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITIES COOPER-
ATIVE FUND. Pursuant to section 67-1206, Idaho Code, the state controller
shall transfer the unobligated cash balance remaining in the public school
facilities cooperative fund established pursuant to section 33-909, Idaho
Code, to the public education facilities fund established pursuant to sec-
tion 33-1017, Idaho Code. Such transfer shall occur on July 1, 2025, or as
soon thereafter as practicable, and no later than December 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. That Section 33-909A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 67-5771A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5771A. PUBLIC SCHOOL HEALTH INSURANCE PARTICIPATION FUND. (1)
There is hereby created in the state treasury the public school health in-
surance participation fund. The fund is continuously appropriated to the
state department of education for the purpose of funding the actuarially
established onetime amount required for a public school to buy in to into
the state's medical and dental group insurance plan. The fund shall consist
of moneys made available through legislative transfers, appropriations, or
as otherwise provided by law and shall be available for use only to publicly
funded K-12 educational institutions. Interest earnings from the invest-
ment of moneys in the fund shall be returned to the fund.
(2) All moneys in the fund shall be used only for onetime expenses as-
sociated with accommodating participation into the state's health plan as
set forth in this section. The state department of education shall make pay-
ment or payments to the office of group insurance for this purpose within a
reasonable time of participants being identified. If demand exceeds avail-
able funds, the state department of education shall administer the fund on
a first-come, first-served basis. No funds may be expended prior to July 1,
2022, and any unexpended moneys remaining in the fund after June 30, 2025,
shall be transferred by the state controller as follows: one-half (1/2) to
the public education facilities fund created in section 33-1017, Idaho Code,
and one-half (1/2) to the public charter school facilities program fund cre-
ated in section 33-5218, Idaho Code.


SECTION 7. That Section 33-1613, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1613. SAFE PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITIES REQUIRED. (1) Definition. As
used in this section, "public school facilities" means the physical plant of
improved or unimproved real property owned or operated by a school district,
a charter school, or a school for children in any grades grade kindergarten
through twelve (12) grade 12 that is operated by the state of Idaho, in-
cluding school buildings, administration buildings, playgrounds, athletic
fields, etc., used by schoolchildren or school personnel in the normal
course of providing a general, uniform and thorough system of public, free
common schools, but does not include areas, buildings or parts of buildings
closed from or not used in the normal course of providing a general, uniform
and thorough system of public, free common schools. The aspects of a safe en-
vironment conducive to learning as provided by section 33-1612, Idaho Code,
that pertain to the physical plant used to provide a general, uniform and
thorough system of public, free common schools are hereby defined as those
necessary to comply with the safety and health requirements set forth in this
section.
(2) Inspection. It is the duty of the board of trustees of every school
district and the governing body for other schools described in subsection
(1) of this section at least once in every school year to require an indepen-
dent inspection of the school district's or other entity's school facilities
to determine whether those school facilities comply with codes addressing
safety and health standards for facilities, including electrical, plumbing,
mechanical, elevator, fire safety, boiler safety, life safety, structural,
snow loading, and sanitary codes, adopted by or pursuant to the Idaho uni-
form school building safety act, chapter 80, title 39, Idaho Code, adopted
by the state fire marshal, adopted by generally applicable local ordinances,
or adopted by rule of the state board of education and applicable to school
facilities. The inspection shall be done pursuant to chapter 80, title 39,
Idaho Code, or by an independent inspector professionally qualified to con-
duct inspections under the applicable code. The results of the inspection
shall be presented to the administrator of the division of occupational and
professional licenses and the board of trustees or other governing body for
its review and consideration.
(3) Abatement required -- Reporting. The board of trustees or other
governing body shall require that the unsafe or unhealthy conditions be
abated and shall instruct the school district's or other entity's person-
nel to take necessary steps to abate unsafe or unhealthy conditions. The
board of trustees or other governing body must issue a report in the same
school year in which the inspections are made declaring whether any unsafe
or unhealthy conditions identified have not been abated. The state board
of education shall, by rule, provide for uniform reporting of unsafe and
unhealthy conditions and for uniform reporting of abatement or absence of
abatement of unsafe and unhealthy conditions. Copies of such reports shall
be provided to the administrator of the division of occupational and profes-
sional licenses and the board of trustees of the school district.
(4) Costs of and plan of abatement. If the school district or other en-
tity described in subsection (1) of this section can abate all unsafe or un-


healthy conditions identified with the funds available to the school dis-
trict or other entity, it shall do so, and it need not separately account for
the costs of abatement nor segregate funds expended for abatement. If the
school district or other entity cannot abate all unsafe or unhealthy con-
ditions identified with the funds available to it, the board of trustees or
other governing body shall direct that a plan of abatement be prepared. The
plan of abatement shall provide a timetable that shall begin no later than
the following school year and that shall provide for abatement with all de-
liberate speed of unsafe and unhealthy conditions identified. The abatement
plan shall be submitted to the administrator of the division of occupational
and professional licenses. The school district or other entity shall imme-
diately begin to implement its plan of abatement and must separately account
for its costs of abatement of unsafe and unhealthy conditions and separately
segregate funds for the abatement of unsafe and unhealthy conditions as re-
quired by subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Special provisions for implementation of plan of abatement.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law concerning expenditure
of lottery moneys distributed to the school district or other entity,
all lottery moneys provided to the school district or other entity for
a school year in which the school district cannot abate unsafe or un-
healthy conditions identified and not legally encumbered to other uses
at the time and all lottery moneys for following school years shall be
segregated and expended exclusively for abatement of unsafe and un-
healthy conditions identified until all of the unhealthy and unsafe
conditions identified are abated, provided, if the school district
has obtained a loan from the school safety and health revolving loan
and grant fund, the provisions of section 33-1017, Idaho Code, and the
conditions of the loan shall determine the use of the school district's
lottery moneys during the term of the loan.
(b) If the lottery moneys referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsec-
tion will, in the board of trustees' or other governing bodies' esti-
mation, be insufficient to abate the unsafe and unhealthy conditions
identified, the plan of abatement shall identify additional sources of
funds to complete the abatement of the unsafe and unhealthy conditions.
The board of trustees may choose from among the following sources, or
from other sources of its own identification, but the plan of abatement
must identify sufficient sources of funds for abatement.
(i) If the school district is not levying under chapter 8, ti-
tle 33, Idaho Code, at the maximum levies allowed by law for levies
that may be imposed by a board of trustees without an election, the
board of trustees may increase any of those levies as allowed by
law for the school year following the school year in which it was
unable to abate unsafe or unhealthy conditions identified.
(ii) If the school district is levying under chapter 8, title 33,
Idaho Code, at the maximum levies allowed by law for levies that
may be imposed by the board of trustees without an election; or,
if, after increasing those levies to the maximum levies allowed by
law for levies that may be imposed by the board of trustees with-
out an election, there will still be insufficient funds to abate
unsafe or unhealthy conditions identified, the school district,


after giving notice and conducting a hearing, may declare a finan-
cial emergency and/or may apply for a loan or, if eligible, an in-
terest grant from the school safety and health revolving loan and
grant fund as provided in section 33-1017, Idaho Code, to obtain
funds to abate the unsafe or unhealthy conditions identified.
(iii) Upon the declaration of a financial emergency, the board of
trustees shall have the power to impose a reduction in force, to
freeze some or all salaries in the school district, and/or to sus-
pend some or all contracts that may be legally suspended upon the
declaration of a financial emergency; provided, that when a board
of trustees declares a financial emergency, or when a declaration
of a financial emergency is imposed by the state treasurer pur-
suant to section 33-1017, Idaho Code, and there is a reduction in
force, some or all salaries are frozen, or some contracts are sus-
pended, the payments to the school district under the foundation
program of chapter 10, title 33, Idaho Code, and in particular the
staff allowances under that chapter, shall not be reduced during
the duration of the financial emergency as a result of a reduction
in force, frozen salaries, or suspended salaries from what the
staff allowance would be without the reduction in force, frozen
salaries or suspended contracts.
(c) All costs of abatement for a program implementing plans of abate-
ment under subsection (5) of this section this subsection must be
separately accounted for and documented with regard to abatement of
each unsafe or unhealthy condition identified. Funds obtained under
section 33-1017, Idaho Code, must be used exclusively to abate unsafe
or unhealthy conditions identified. Funds obtained pursuant to section
33-1017, Idaho Code, in excess of funds necessary to abate unsafe or
unhealthy conditions identified must be returned as provided in section
33-1017, Idaho Code. Return of these funds shall be judicially enforce-
able as provided in section 33-1017, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. That Section 6-2212, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-2212. STATE SUPERVISION. When authorized by law, the district
court, or the state board of education pursuant to section 33-909, Idaho
Code, may issue an order for state supervision of a local school district.
When an order for state supervision of a local school district is entered by
the district court, the superintendent of public instruction shall within
thirty-five (35) calendar days appoint, at local school district expense, an
officer to be known as a district supervisor. When an order for state super-
vision of a local school district is entered by the state board of education,
the district supervisor shall be appointed pursuant to section 33-909, Idaho
Code, at local school district expense. The district supervisor shall have
authority to approve or disapprove any actions of the board of the local
school district, to supervise or dismiss superintendents, assistant super-
intendents, and any other district administrative personnel, and to take
any actions necessary to further the local school district's obligations
to provide constitutionally required educational services. In the case
of appointment by the superintendent of public instruction, the district


supervisor shall serve at the pleasure of the superintendent of public in-
struction until removed by the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent of public instruction reports to the district court that the
local school district is in substantial compliance with its obligations to
provide constitutionally required educational services, or until the dis-
trict court, upon its own motion or upon motion of any of the parties, orders
state supervision to end. In the case of appointment by the state board of
education, the district supervisor shall serve pursuant to section 33-909,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. That Section 39-8011, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-8011. VIOLATIONS. (1) If a school district, the district superin-
tendent, principal, board of trustees, or other person in charge willfully
violates the provisions of this chapter, the state superintendent of pub-
lic instruction shall withhold such ensuing apportionments as are necessary
to make repairs to abate the identified imminent safety hazard or serious
safety hazard. Withheld funds, not to exceed one and one-half percent (1
1/2%) of the district's appropriation, shall be disbursed only to pay for
such repairs.
(2) If the funds that would be raised over two (2) fiscal years from ap-
plying the provisions of subsection (1) of this section are insufficient, in
combination with all moneys that will be available in the district's school
building maintenance allocation for the same period, to provide sufficient
moneys to abate the identified imminent or serious safety hazard, then the
administrator shall submit an application to abate said hazard to the Idaho
public school facilities cooperative funding program panel pursuant to sec-
tion 33-909, Idaho Code.
(3) (2) It is a misdemeanor to remove, without permission of the admin-
istrator, a notice or order posted pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1, 2, 4, 6, and 7 of this act shall be in full
force and effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 3, 5, 8, and
9 of this act shall be in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2026.